pt-PT: Material do corpo do dardo: Latão; Alpaca; Plástico; Aço; Tungsténio; Outro
fr: Matériau du corps de fléchette: Laiton; Maillechort; Plastique; Acier; Tungstène; Autre
sk-SK: Materiál tela šípok: Mosadz; Alpaka; Plast; Oceľ; Volfrám; Iné
ru: Материал барреля дротика: Латунь; Нейзильбер; Пластик; Сталь; Вольфрам; Другое
it: Materiale del fusto della freccetta: Ottone; Alpacca; Plastica; Acciaio; Tungsteno; Altro
es: Material del cañón del dardo: Latón; Alpaca; Plástico; Acero; Tungsteno; Otro
lt-LT: Smiginio strėlytės korpuso medžiaga: Žalvaris; Naujasidabris; Plastikas; Plienas; Volframas; Kita
bg-BG: Материал на тялото на стреличката за дартс: Месинг; Немско сребро; Пластмаса; Стомана; Волфрам; Други
pt-BR: Material do corpo do dardo: Latão; Alpaca; Plástico; Aço; Tungstênio; Outro
ko: 다트 배럴 재질: 황동; 니켈 실버; 플라스틱; 스틸; 텅스텐; 기타
nl: Dartbarrel materiaal: Messing; Nieuwzilver; Plastic; Staal; Tungsten; Overige
tr: Dart gövdesi malzemesi: Pirinç; Nikel gümüş; Plastik; Çelik; Tungsten; Diğer
de: Material des Dartbarrels: Messing; Neusilber; Kunststoff; Stahl; Wolfram; Sonstige
hr-HR: Materijal cijevi strelice: Mjed; Novo srebro; Plastika; Čelik; Volfram; Ostalo
ja: ダーツバレル素材: 真鍮; 洋白; プラスチック; スチール; タングステン; その他
zh-TW: 飛鏢鏢身材質: 黃銅; 白銅; 塑膠; 鋼; 鎢; 其他
th: วัสดุของบาร์เรลลูกดอก: ทองเหลือง; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; พลาสติก; เหล็ก; ทังสเตน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Materialul țevii dartului: Alamă; Alpaca; Plastic; Oțel; Tungsten; Altele
sl-SI: Material trupa pikado puščice: Medenina; Alpaka (nikljevo srebro); Plastika; Jeklo; Volfram; Drugo
da: Dartpilens materiale: Messing; Nysølv; Plastik; Stål; Wolfram; Andet
nb: Materiale for dartløp: Messing; Nysølv; Plast; Stål; Tungsten; Annet
el: Υλικό του κορμού βέλους: Ορείχαλκος; Αλπακάς; Πλαστικό; Ατσάλι; Βολφράμιο; Άλλο
sv: Material för dartpipor: Mässing; Nysilver; Plast; Stål; Tungsten; Övrigt
fi: Tikan runkomateriaali: Messinki; Uushopea; Muovi; Teräs; Volframi; Muu
cs: Materiál hlavně šipky: Mosaz; Alpaka; Plast; Ocel; Wolfram; Jiné
zh-CN: 镖杆材质: 黄铜; 镍银（白铜）; 塑料; 钢; 钨; 其他
hu: Darts cső anyaga: Sárgaréz; Alpakka; Műanyag; Acél; Volfrám; Egyéb
vi: Vật liệu thân phi tiêu: Đồng thau; Bạc niken; Nhựa; Thép; Vonfram; Khác
en: Dart barrel material: Brass; Nickel silver; Plastic; Steel; Tungsten; Other
pl: Materiał barrelu lotki: Mosiądz; Nowe srebro; Plastik; Stal; Wolfram; Inne